California statutes. Public Utilities Code
-------------------------------------------

21407.1.

(a) It is unlawful for any person, who is under the influence of an alcoholic beverage or any drug, or the combined influence of an alcoholic beverage and any drug, to operate an aircraft in the air, or on the ground or water, or to engage in parachuting for sport.

(b) No person shall operate an aircraft in the air or on the ground or water who has 0.04 percent or more, by weight, of alcohol in his or her blood.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 21407.5 by Stats. 1987, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21407.2.

(a) (1) (A) Any person who operates an aircraft in the air or on the ground or water is deemed to have given his or her consent to chemical testing of his or her blood or breath for the purpose of determining the alcoholic content of his or her blood, if lawfully arrested for any offense allegedly committed in violation of Section 21407.1 or if the officer requests chemical testing as part of any investigation of a suspected violation of state or local law. If a blood or breath test, or both, are unavailable, then paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) applies.

(B) Any person who operates an aircraft in the air or on the ground or water is deemed to have given his or her consent to chemical testing of his or her blood or urine for the purpose of determining the drug content of his or her blood, if lawfully arrested for any offense allegedly committed in violation of Section 21407.1 or if the officer requests chemical testing as part of an investigation of a suspected violation of state or local law.

(C) The testing shall be administered at the direction of a peace officer having reasonable cause to believe the person was operating an aircraft in violation of Section 21407.1 under either of the following conditions:

(i) The person is lawfully arrested.

(ii) The officer requests the person to submit to chemical testing as part of an investigation of a suspected violation of state or local law.

(D) The person shall be told that his or her failure to submit to, or the failure to complete, the required chemical testing may result in prohibition from operating an aircraft for not more than one year and, if the person is convicted of a violation of Section 21407.1, a fine, imprisonment, prohibition from operating an aircraft for not more than one year, or any combination thereof.

(2) (A) If the person is lawfully arrested for operating an aircraft under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, the person has the choice of whether the test shall be of his or her blood or breath, and the officer shall advise the person that he or she has that choice. If the person arrested either is incapable, or states that he or she is incapable, of completing the chosen test, the person shall submit to the remaining test. If a blood or breath test, or both, are unavailable, then paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) applies.

(B) If the person is lawfully arrested for operating an aircraft under the influence of any drug or the combined influence of an alcoholic beverage and any drug, the person has the choice of whether the test shall be of his or her blood, breath, or urine, and the officer shall advise the person that he or she has that choice.

(C) A person who chooses to submit to a breath test may also be requested to submit to a blood or urine test if the officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person was operating an aircraft under the influence of any drug or the combined influence of an alcoholic beverage and any drug and if the officer has a clear indication that a blood or urine test will reveal evidence of the person being under the influence. The officer shall state in his or her report the facts upon which that belief and that clear indication are based. If the person who is arrested is either incapable or states that he or she is incapable of completing a blood test, that person shall submit to and complete a urine test. If the person arrested either is incapable, or states that he or she is incapable, of completing either chosen test, the person shall submit to and complete the other remaining test.

(3) If the person is lawfully arrested for an offense allegedly committed in violation of Section 21407.1 and, because of the need for medical treatment, the person is first transported to a medical facility where it is not feasible to administer a particular test of, or to obtain a particular sample of, the person’s blood, breath, or urine, the person has the choice of those tests which are available at the facility to which that person has been transported. In that event, the officer shall advise the person of those tests which are available at the medical facility and that the person’s choice is limited to those tests which are available.

(4) The officer shall also advise the person that he or she does not have the right to have an attorney present before stating whether he or she will submit to a test or tests, before deciding which test or tests to take, or during administration of the test or tests chosen, and that, in the event of refusal to submit to a test or tests, the refusal may be used against him or her in a court of law.

(5) Any person who is unconscious or otherwise in a condition rendering him or her incapable of refusal is deemed not to have withdrawn his or her consent and a test or tests may be administered whether or not the person is told that his or her failure to submit to, or the noncompletion of, the test or tests may result in a fine, imprisonment, and prohibition from operating an aircraft for not more than one year. Any person who is dead is deemed not to have withdrawn his or her consent and a test or tests may be administered at the direction of a peace officer.

(b) Any person who is afflicted with hemophilia is exempt from the blood test required by this section.

(c) Any person who is afflicted with a heart condition and is using an anticoagulant under the direction of a licensed physician and surgeon is exempt from the blood test required by this section.

(d) (1) A person lawfully arrested for any offense allegedly committed while the person was operating an aircraft in violation of Section 21407.1 may request the arresting officer to have a chemical test made of the arrested person’s blood or breath for the purpose of determining the alcoholic content of that person’s blood, and, if so requested, the arresting officer shall have the test performed.

(2) If a blood or breath test is not available under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), or under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), or under paragraph (1) of this subdivision, the person shall submit to the remaining test in order to determine the percent, by weight, of alcohol in the person’s blood. If both the blood and breath tests are unavailable, the person shall be deemed to have given his or her consent to chemical testing of his or her urine and shall submit to a urine test.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 740, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

21407.6.

(a) Any person convicted under Section 21407.1 shall be punished upon a first conviction by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 30 days nor more than six months or by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by both that fine and imprisonment.

Any person convicted under Section 21407.1 shall be punished upon a second or any subsequent conviction by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than five days nor more than one year and by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), without being granted probation by the court and without having the court suspend the
 execution of the sentence.

(b) Any person convicted under Section 21407.1 and who, when so operating an aircraft, has done any act forbidden by law or neglects any duty imposed by law in the operation of the aircraft, which act or neglect proximately causes bodily injury to any person other than the operator shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in the county jail for not less than 90 days nor more than one year and by fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 564.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

21408.

For any violation of Section 21407 or 21407.1, in addition to the penalties provided by Section 21019 or 21407.6, the court may prohibit the violator from operating an aircraft within the state for a period not exceeding one year. Violation of the prohibition of the court may be treated as a separate offense under this section or as a contempt of court. Upon a plea of guilty or conviction under Section 21407 or 21407.1, the department shall cause a record of the plea or conviction and of the sentence imposed to be maintained. This section does not authorize the court or any other agency or person to take away, impound, hold, or mark any federal certificate, permit, rating, or license. The peace officer requesting that a person submit to a chemical test of the blood, breath, or urine pursuant to Section 21407.2 shall report anyone refusing to submit to the chemical test to the Federal Aviation Administration for appropriate administrative action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 526, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

21409.

It is unlawful for any person to engage in aeronautics as an airman in the State unless he has an appropriate effective airman certificate, permit, rating, or license issued by the United States authorizing him to engage in the particular class of aeronautics in which he is engaged, if the certificate, permit, rating, or license is required by the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

21410.

Every airman shall keep any certificate, permit, rating, or license required for him by the United States in his personal possession when he is operating within the state. He shall present it for inspection upon the demand of any peace officer, any other officer of the state or of a political subdivision, or member, official, or employee of the department, authorized by Section 21252 to enforce the aeronautics laws, or any official, manager, or person in charge of any airport upon which the airman lands, or upon the reasonable request of any other person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21411.

It is unlawful for any person to operate, or cause or authorize to be operated, any civil aircraft within this State unless the aircraft has an appropriate effective certificate, permit, or license issued by the United States if required by the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

21412.

Any certificate, permit, or license required by the United States for an aircraft shall be carried in the aircraft at all times while the aircraft is operating in the state, shall be conspicuously posted in the aircraft where it may be readily seen by passengers or inspectors, and shall be presented for inspection upon the demand of any peace officer, any other officer of the state or of a political subdivision, or member, official, or employee of the department, authorized by Section 21252 to enforce the aeronautics laws, or any official, manager, or person in charge of any airport upon which the aircraft lands, or upon the reasonable request of any person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21413.

The department shall report to the appropriate federal agency all accidents in aeronautics in this state of which it is informed, and shall, insofar as is practicable, preserve, protect, and prevent the removal of the component parts of any aircraft involved in an accident being investigated by it until the federal agency institutes an investigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21415.

No person shall be in, or perform any act in connection with the maintenance or operation of, any aircraft when under the influence of intoxicating liquor.

This section does not apply to a person who is in an aircraft merely as a passenger, but this section shall not be construed to relieve any such person of criminal liability imposed by any other law for being intoxicated while in an aircraft.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1639.)
-------------------------------------------

21416.

On all commercial aircraft which transport passengers for compensation or hire the door which separates the pilot compartment from the passenger compartment shall be kept locked at all times the aircraft is in a flight over this state during which passengers are being transported except:

(a) During takeoff and landing of the airplane when such door is the means of access to a required passenger emergency exit.

(b) At such times as it may be necessary to provide access to the flight crew or passenger compartments for the crew members in the performance of their duties, or to provide access for other persons authorized admission to the flight crew compartment.

The pilot of the aircraft shall be guilty of a misdemeanor if the door is not so locked.

It shall be unlawful for any person, except a member of the crew, to have in his possession in the passenger compartment at any time the aircraft is in a flight over this state during which passengers are being transported a key or other device for opening such door from the passenger side of the door.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 341.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Airports and Air Navigation Facilities [21601. - 21690.29.]



  ARTICLE 1. Assistance to Political Subdivisions [21601. - 21605.]

21601.

The department may make available its engineering and other technical services, with or without charge, to any political subdivision or person desiring them in connection with the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of airports or air navigation facilities, subject to rules promulgated by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21602.

(a) Subject to the terms and within the limits of special appropriations made by the Legislature, the department may render financial assistance by grant or loan, or both, to political subdivisions jointly, in the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of an airport owned or controlled, or to be owned or controlled, by a political subdivision or subdivisions, if the financial assistance has been shown by public hearing to be appropriate to the proper development or maintenance of a statewide system of airports. Financial assistance may be furnished in connection with federal or other financial aid for the same purpose.

(b) Notwithstanding
 subdivision (a) of Section 21681, a city or county designated by the Airport Land Use Commission is eligible to compete for funds held in the Aeronautics Account in the State Transportation Fund on behalf of any privately owned, public use airport that is included in an airport land use compatibility plan. However, the city or county shall be eligible to compete for the funds only when zoning on the parcel is tantamount to a taking of all reasonable uses that might otherwise be permitted on the parcel. The eligible airport and aviation purposes are limited to those specified in paragraphs (4), (5), (6), (9), and (14) of subdivision (f) of Section 21681, and, further, any capital improvements or acquisitions shall become the property of the designated city or county. Matching funds pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 21684 may include the in-kind contribution of real property, with the approval of the department.

(c) Any grant of funds held
 in the Aeronautics Account in the State Transportation Fund on behalf of any privately owned airports shall contain a covenant that the airport remain open for public use for 20 years. Any grant made to a city or county on behalf of a privately owned airport shall contain a payback provision based upon existing market value at the time the private airport ceases to be open for public use.

(d) Upon request, California Aid to Airports Program (CAAP) projects included within the adopted Aeronautics Program, may be funded in advance of the year programmed, with the concurrence of the department, in order to better utilize funds in the account.

(e) There is, in the Aeronautics Account in the State Transportation Fund, a subaccount, the Local Airport Loan Account, for the management of funds for loans to local entities pursuant to this chapter. All funds for airport loans in the Special
 Deposit Fund are hereby transferred to the subaccount. With the approval of the Department of Finance, the department shall deposit in the subaccount all money received by the department from repayments of, and interest on, existing and future airport loans, including, but not limited to, the sums of five hundred forty thousand dollars ($540,000) in repayments from the General Fund due in July 1987, and July 1988, and may, upon appropriation, transfer additional funds from the Aeronautics Account in the State Transportation Fund to the subaccount as the department deems appropriate. Interest on money in the subaccount shall be credited to the subaccount as it accrues.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the subaccount created by subdivision (e) is hereby continuously appropriated to the department without regard to fiscal years for purposes of loans to political
 subdivisions for airport purposes.

(2) Upon a determination by the department that the balance in the subaccount exceeds projected needs, funds in the subaccount may be transferred by the department to the Aeronautics Account to fund the California Aid to Airports Program with the approval of the California Transportation Commission and the Department of Finance. The transfers shall not reduce the amount of funds in the subaccount below five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 27, Sec. 1.   (SB 853)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

21603.

Upon the request of any political subdivision or political subdivisions acting jointly, the department may act as agent in accepting, receiving, receipting for, and disbursing federal money, and other money public or private, made available to finance, in whole or in part, the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of a public airport or air navigation facility. The department may act as agent in contracting for and supervising the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation. Any political subdivision may designate the department as its agent for these purposes.

The department as principal on behalf of the state, and any political subdivision on its own behalf, may enter into any contracts with each other, the United States, or any person, which may be required in connection with a grant or loan of federal money for public airport or air navigation facility purposes.

All federal money accepted under this section shall be accepted and transferred or expended by the department upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the United States. All money received by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Special Deposit Fund in the State Treasury, to be disbursed or expended in accordance with the terms and conditions upon which it was made available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21605.

No proprietor of any permitted airport which is open to the public and has received public funds shall close or suspend operation of the airport, or close an existing runway or taxiway except on a temporary basis for inspection, maintenance, construction, or emergency purposes, without notifying the department in writing 60 days prior to the intended closure or suspension of operations. On its own motion or upon the request of an affected or interested person, the department may conduct a public hearing to determine the impact of the intended closure or suspension of operations, both economically and on the entire state air transportation system. The department may take appropriate action to assist the proprietor in keeping the airport operational and open for public use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 707, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. State Airports and Air Navigation Facilities [21631. - 21646.]

21631.

From appropriations or other money made available for the purpose, the department, on behalf of and in the name of the state, may plan, establish, construct, enlarge, improve, maintain, equip, operate, regulate, and protect airports and air navigation facilities, either within or without the state, including the construction, installation, equipment, maintenance, and operation at the airports of buildings and other facilities for the servicing of aircraft or for the comfort and accommodation of air travelers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21632.

(a) The department may also acquire existing airports and air navigation facilities, but it shall not acquire any airport or air navigation facility owned or controlled by a political subdivision of this or any other state without the consent of the political subdivision.

(b) Whenever an airport owned or operated by the United States in this state ceases to be so owned or operated, the department, in consultation with local and regional transportation planning agencies, may evaluate the present and future need for the airport in the state’s public-use airport system, including the need for both the transportation of people and goods. The purpose of the evaluation is to determine aviation needs and does not eliminate any requirement of the California Environmental Quality Act, Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.

(c) Prior to finalizing the evaluation, the department shall submit a copy of its report to the commission for review and comment. The commission shall complete its review and forward any comments to the department not later than 45 days after receiving the evaluation.

(d) Upon completion of its evaluation, the department may make a recommendation to the Legislature, the commission, the affected local agencies, and the appropriate federal agency for the airport’s ownership and type of operation as a public-use airport, if the department determines that the airport would be of significant benefit to the state’s airport system. It is the intent of the Legislature that the department, in making its recommendation, give priority for ownership and operation of these public-use airports to a local political subdivision or subdivisions acting jointly.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 21606, if a political subdivision or subdivisions acting jointly notify the department of their intentions to prepare a reuse plan for the airport, and simultaneously apply to the Federal Aviation Administration for a federal grant to develop an airport master plan for the airport, the department shall not make its recommendation pursuant to subdivision (d). If the department’s evaluation determines that the airport would be of significant benefit to the state’s airport system, and the political subdivision or subdivisions acting jointly fail to convert the federal airport to a civil public-use airport in accordance with the department’s evaluation within five years of notification to the department, or fail to evidence substantial progress toward that purpose as determined by the department, then the department may take action in accordance with subdivision (f).

(f) If the department determines the airport is of present or future benefit to the state’s public-use airport system, and no political subdivision applies to the appropriate federal agency to acquire or operate the airport, or has notified the department of its intention to prepare a reuse plan for the airport and thereafter fails to act upon its application pursuant to subdivision (e), the department may, subject to subdivision (g), assist in the formation of a public entity to own and operate the airport which shall be representative of political subdivisions in the area which surrounds and is served by the airport, as determined by the department. If established, the owning and operating entity may, subject to subdivision (g), prepare and submit an application to the appropriate federal agency to acquire or operate, or acquire and operate, the airport as a public airport.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (f), if any political subdivision has previously applied to the appropriate federal agency to acquire and operate the airport as a public airport, has completed all required environmental and fiscal evaluations, and subsequently withdrew its application prior to December 31, 1988, the department shall not file any application to acquire or operate the airport or assist in the formation of a public entity to own and operate the airport.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 860, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

21633.

For the purposes of this article, the department, by purchase, gift, devise, lease, condemnation, or otherwise, may acquire real or personal property, or any interest therein, including any property described in Section 21652.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1239.)
-------------------------------------------

21636.

The department may dispose of any property, airport, air navigation facility, or portion or interest, acquired pursuant to this article, by sale, lease, or otherwise. The disposal shall be in accordance with the laws of this state governing the disposition of other state property, except that in the case of disposals to any political subdivision or government or the United States for aeronautical purposes, the disposal may be effected in the manner and upon the terms the department deems in the best interests of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21637.

In operating an airport or air navigation facility owned or controlled by the state, the department may enter into contracts, leases, and other arrangements for a term not exceeding 20 years with any person, granting the privilege of using or improving the airport or air navigation facility or space therein for commercial purposes, conferring the privilege of supplying goods, commodities, things, services, or facilities at the airport or air navigation facility, or making available services to be furnished by the department or its agents at the airport or air navigation facility. In each case the department may establish the terms and conditions and fix the charges, rentals, or fees for the privileges or services, which shall be reasonable and uniform for the same class of privilege or service and shall be established with regard to the property and improvement used and the expenses of operation to the state. In no case shall the public be deprived of its rightful, equal, and uniform use of the airport, air navigation facility, or portion of either. The department shall grant no exclusive privilege for the sale or delivery of gasoline or other petroleum products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21638.

The department shall call for bids for the operation of any state-owned airport and shall lease the airport for a term not to exceed five years to the highest qualified bidder or bidders. No person shall be granted any authority to operate the airport other than as a public airport or to enter into any contracts, leases, or other arrangements in connection with the operation of the airport which the department might not have undertaken under Section 21637. The state may operate an airport only if no acceptable bid is received.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21639.

The department shall grant no exclusive right for the use of any airport or air navigation facility under its jurisdiction. This section shall not be construed to prevent the making of contracts, leases, and other arrangements pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21640.

To enforce the payment of any charges for repairs, improvements, storage, or care of any personal property by the department or its agents in connection with the operation of an airport or air navigation facility owned or operated by the state, the state has a lien on the property, which is enforceable by the department as provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21646.

It shall be a misdemeanor for any person to release or fly or cause to be released or flown, within five miles of any airport, any moored balloon, kite, unmanned rocket, or unmanned free balloon which might be ingested by an aircraft engine or might cause a pilot’s view of the airport and zone approach to be obstructed, or which could be used to suspend an object capable of endangering airborne aircraft or impairing a pilot’s vision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1350.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Non-Public-Use Airports [21650. - 21650.2.]

21650.

“Airport” for the purposes of this article means an airport not open to the general public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 17.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

21650.1.

An airport shall be marked as required by rule of the department with letters or symbol selected by the department to designate that the airport is not open to the general public. In selecting the letters or symbol, the department shall be guided by letters or symbols currently in use by the Federal Aviation Administration for similar or comparable purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 18.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

21650.2.

Nothing shall prevent an airport from applying for and receiving a permit pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 21661) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 19.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.6. Hazard Elimination; Flight Disturbance [21652. - 21653.]

21652.

(a) Any person authorized to exercise the power of eminent domain for airport purposes may acquire by purchase, gift, devise, lease, condemnation, or otherwise:

(1) Any property necessary to permit the safe and efficient operation of the airport, or to permit the removal, elimination, obstruction-marking, or obstruction-lighting of airport hazards, or to prevent the establishment of airport hazards.

(2) Airspace or an easement in such airspace above the surface of property where necessary to permit imposition upon such property of excessive noise, vibration, discomfort, inconvenience, interference with use and enjoyment, and any consequent reduction in market value, due to the operation of aircraft to and from the airport.

(3) Remainder property underlying property taken pursuant to paragraph (2), where permitted by Section 1240.410 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) As used in this section, “property” includes real and personal property and any right or interest therein, whether within, beyond, adjacent to, or in the vicinity of, the boundaries of an airport or airport site, and, by way of illustration and not by way of limitation, includes air rights, airspace, air easements, and easements in airport hazards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

21653.

Any person authorized to exercise the power of eminent domain for airport purposes may provide, by purchase, gift, devise, lease, condemnation, or otherwise, for the removal or relocation of any airport hazard or the removal or relocation of all facilities, structures, and equipment that may interfere with the location, expansion, development, or improvement of the airport and other air navigation facilities or with the safe approach thereto and takeoff therefrom by aircraft. Any person acting under authority of this section shall pay the cost of such removal or relocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.7. Regulation of Obstructions [21655. - 21659.]

21655.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the proposed site of any state building or other enclosure is within two miles, measured by air line, of that point on an airport runway, or runway proposed by an airport master plan, which is nearest the site, the state agency or office which proposes to construct the building or other enclosure shall, before acquiring title to property for the new state building or other enclosure site or for an addition to a present site, notify the Department of Transportation, in writing, of the proposed acquisition. The
 department shall investigate the proposed site and, within 30 working days after receipt of the notice, shall submit to the state agency or office which proposes to construct the building or other enclosure a written report of the investigation and its recommendations concerning acquisition of the site.

If the report of the department does not favor acquisition of the site, no state funds shall be expended for the acquisition of the new state building or other enclosure site, or the expansion of the present site, or for the construction of the state building or other enclosure, provided that the provisions of this section shall not affect title to real property once it is acquired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 20.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

21656.

No person shall erect or add to the height of any structure within the boundaries of this state which will result in a structure that extends more than 500 feet above the ground on which such structure rests until a permit therefor has been issued for such purpose by the department. This section is not applicable to the construction of any structure if the Federal Communications Commission is required to approve the height of the structure or if the height of the structure is required to be approved under the Federal Aviation Act of 1958 (Public Law 85-726; 72 Stat. 731).

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 398.)
-------------------------------------------

21657.

The department may refuse issuance of a permit under Section 21656 if it determines that the erection of or addition to a structure would obstruct the airspace overlying the state so as to create an unsafe condition for the flight of aircraft.

Any person denied a permit shall, upon request, be granted a hearing by the department to determine whether a permit shall be issued. The hearing shall be held pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 511.)
-------------------------------------------

21658.

No public utility shall construct any pole, pole line, distribution or transmission tower, or tower line, or substation structure in the vicinity of the exterior boundary of an aircraft landing area of any airport open to public use, in a location with respect to the airport and at a height so as to constitute an obstruction to air navigation, as an obstruction is defined in accordance with Part 77 of the Federal Aviation Regulations, Federal Aviation Administration, or any corresponding rules or regulations of the Federal Aviation Administration, unless the Federal Aviation Administration has determined that the pole, line, tower, or structure does not
 constitute a hazard to air navigation. This section shall not apply to existing poles, lines, towers, or structures or to the repair, replacement, or reconstruction thereof if the original height is not materially exceeded and this section shall not apply unless just compensation shall have first been paid to the public utility by the owner of any airport for any property or property rights which would be taken or damaged hereby.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

21659.

(a) No person shall construct or alter any structure or permit any natural growth to grow at a height which exceeds the obstruction standards set forth in the regulations of the Federal Aviation Administration relating to objects affecting navigable airspace contained in Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations, Part 77, Subpart C, unless the Federal Aviation Administration has determined that the construction, alteration, or growth does not constitute a hazard to air navigation or would not create an unsafe condition for air navigation.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a pole, pole line, distribution or transmission tower, or tower line or
 substation of a public utility, as specified in Section 21658.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 198, Sec. 3.   (AB 3246)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Regulation of Airports [21661. - 21669.6.]

21661.

This article does not apply to any temporary seaplane landing site, ultralight vehicle flightpark, or to airports owned or operated by the United States. To the extent necessary, the department may exempt any other class of airports, pursuant to a reasonable classification or grouping, from any rule or requirement thereof, adopted pursuant to this article, if it finds that its application would be an undue burden on the class and is not required in the interest of public safety.

This section shall become operative on January 1, 1989.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4) and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1215, Sec. 5.   Section operative January 1, 1989, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21661.5.

(a) No political subdivision, any of its officers or employees, or any person may submit any application for the construction of a new airport to any local, regional, state, or federal agency unless the plan for construction is first approved by the board of supervisors of the county, or the city council of the city, in which the airport is to be located and unless the plan is submitted to the appropriate commission exercising powers pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 21670) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 9, and acted upon by that commission in accordance with the provisions of that article.

(b) A county board of supervisors or a city council may, pursuant to Section 65100 of the Government Code, delegate its responsibility under this section for the approval of a plan for construction of new helicopter landing and takeoff areas, to the county or city planning agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 172.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

21661.6.
